Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8075.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-7 of the General Laws entitled "Liability Insurance" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-7-8. Firearm ownership.
(a) Any individual who owns a firearm shall obtain and continuously maintain a policy of
liability insurance in an amount not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) specifically covering
any damages resulting from any negligent acts involving the use of such firearm while it is owned
by such person. Failure to maintain such insurance shall result in the immediate revocation of such
owner's registration, license and any other privilege to own such firearm.
(b) For purposes of this section, a person shall be deemed to be the owner of a firearm if
such firearm is lost or stolen until such loss or theft is reported to the police department or sheriff
which has jurisdiction in the county, town or city in which such owner resides.
(c) Any person who owns a firearm on the effective date of this section shall obtain the
insurance required by this section within thirty (30) days of such effective date.
(d) Evidence of insurance shall be kept where firearms are stored or when transported.
(e) Proof of liability insurance shall be shown to law enforcement during a lawful
encounter.
(f) This requirement shall not apply to active duty law enforcement or active duty military
personnel.
(g) The department of business regulation is hereby authorized to promulgate rules and

regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005713
========
LC005713 - Page 2 of 3